Utah, session 2026, HB35.
Section 1. Section 63I-1-209 is amended to read:63I-1-209. Repeal dates: Title 9.(1)Subsection 9-1-208(5), regarding the One Utah Service Fellowship Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(2)Section 9-6-301, Utah Arts and Museums Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 9-6-302, Arts and museums board powers and duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(4)Subsection 9-8a-101(2), regarding the National Register Review Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Section 9-8a-204, National Register Review Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Section 9-9-112, Bears Ears Visitor Center Advisory Committee, is repealed December 31, 20262028.(7)Section 9-9-405, Review committee, is repealed July 1, 2030.(8)Title 9, Chapter 20, Utah Commission on Service and Volunteerism Act, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.